Wyoming, session 2026, HB0115.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-3-138 is created to read:

21-3-138. Cardiac emergency response plans; athletic
cardiac emergency response plans.

(a) Each school district board of trustees shall
develop a cardiac emergency response plan as provided in
HB0115

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0414
this section. The cardiac emergency response plan shall
apply to each school in the district, including any charter
school. The cardiac emergency response plan shall:

(i) Address the appropriate use of school
personnel to respond to incidents involving a person
experiencing sudden cardiac arrest or a similar
life-threatening emergency while on school property;

(ii) Integrate evidence-based elements into the
response plan as recommended by the American heart
association standards or other nationally recognized,
evidence-based standards focused on emergency
cardiovascular care;

(iii) Include requirements for the availability
and use of automatic external defibrillators which shall:

(A) Specify appropriate automatic external
defibrillator placement in every school in accordance with
the American heart association standards or other
nationally recognized, evidence-based standards focused on
emergency cardiovascular care;
HB0115

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0414

(B) Require each automatic external
defibrillator to be identified with appropriate signage and
made available in an unlocked location on school property
that is able to be placed on a victim in not more than
three (3) minutes;

(C) Require each automatic external
defibrillator to be tested and maintained according to the
manufacturer's operational guidelines;

(D) Require each school to provide notice
to the appropriate first aid, ambulance or other
appropriate emergency medical care provider as defined
under W.S. 19-13-202(a)(i) regarding the automatic external
defibrillator including the type acquired and its location
in the school.

(iv) Require school nurses and other appropriate
school personnel to obtain and maintain training in first
aid, cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) and automatic
external defibrillator use. Training under this paragraph
HB0115

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0414
shall be consistent with national evidence-based emergency
cardiovascular care guidelines.

(b) Each school district board of trustees shall
develop an athletic cardiac emergency response plan as
provided in this section. The athletic cardiac emergency
response plan shall apply to each school in the district,
including any charter school, that has an athletic
department or organized athletic program. The athletic
cardiac emergency response plan shall:

(i) Address the appropriate use of school
personnel to respond to incidents involving a person
experiencing sudden cardiac arrest or a similar
life-threatening emergency while attending or participating
in an athletic practice, game or event while on school
property;

(ii) Integrate evidence-based elements into the
response plan as recommended by the American heart
association standards or other nationally recognized,
evidence-based standards focused on emergency
cardiovascular care;
HB0115

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0414

(iii) Specify procedures for each athletic venue
in the district, which shall be rehearsed annually;

(iv) Be distributed to all athletics staff
members and any other necessary school personnel and shall
also be made available to any health care professionals
that provide medical services during games, practices or
other events;

(v) Include requirements for the availability
and use of automatic external defibrillators which shall:

(A) Require an automated external
defibrillator to be clearly marked and easily accessible in
an unlocked location at each athletic venue and event. The
automated external defibrillator shall be accessible during
the school day and during any school sponsored athletic
event or practice if pupils of the school are
participating;

HB0115

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0414
(B) Require each automatic external
defibrillator to be tested and maintained according to the
manufacturer's operational guidelines;

(C) Require each school to provide notice
to the appropriate first aid, ambulance or other
appropriate emergency medical care provider as defined
under W.S. 19-13-202(a)(i) regarding the automatic external
defibrillator including the type acquired and its location
in the athletic venue.

(vi) Require all athletic coaches and other
appropriate personnel to obtain and maintain training in
first aid, cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) and
automatic external defibrillator use. Training under this
paragraph shall be consistent with national evidence-based
emergency cardiovascular care guidelines.

Section 2. W.S. 21-3-110(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xlv) is amended to read:

21-3-110. Duties of boards of trustees.

HB0115

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0414
(a) The board of trustees in each school district
shall:

(xlv) Commencing with school year 2026-2027,
adopt policies, procedures and rules necessary to implement
the provisions of W.S. 21-3-138 related to acute cardiac
events in schools and athletic events and providing for the
availability of automatic external defibrillators.

Section 3. There is appropriated fifty thousand
dollars ($50,000.00) from the public school foundation
program account to the department of education-school
finance to provide funding to school districts to implement
cardiac emergency response plans and athletic cardiac
emergency response plans as required by section 1 of this
act for school years 2026-2027 and 2027-2028. School
districts shall be reimbursed based on actual costs to
implement the plans that are submitted to the department of
education-school finance, provided that, to the extent that
funds appropriated under this section are insufficient to
reimburse each school district for their costs to implement
the plans, priority for reimbursement shall be given to
school districts with a higher percentage of students
HB0115

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0414
within the district who are eligible to participate in the
free and reduced price lunch program. This appropriation
shall be for the period beginning with the effective date
of this act and ending June 30, 2028. This appropriation
shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose
and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2028. It is the intent of the legislature that the
appropriation in this section be included in the standard
budget of the department of education-school finance for
the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0115